District of Columbia statutes.
42-1102.01

Sales or assignments of instruments on secondary market exempt from tax.

A sale or assignment of a note, mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument from one lender to another, on the secondary market, where there are no changes in the terms or conditions provided in the instrument and the borrower has taken no action to refinance, shall be exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter.

History

Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 11, Pub. L. 87-408, title III, § 302a
as added June 14, 1994, D.C. Law 10-128, § 101(c), 41 DCR 2096

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-922.1.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-128: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-1101.